California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(d) This section shall apply to property tax lien dates for the 2026–27 fiscal year to the 2031–32 fiscal year, inclusive.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2033, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 2, Sec. 1.   (AB 1485)   Effective February 10, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

214.05.

For purposes of Section 214:

(a) If the property of an organization is granted an exemption pursuant to Section 214, that property is deemed to be used exclusively for the organization’s exempt purposes. However, to the extent that income derived from the organization’s use of the property is unrelated business taxable income, as defined in Section 512 of the Internal Revenue Code, and the regulations implementing that section, and is subject to the tax on unrelated business taxable income which is imposed by Section 511 of the Internal Revenue Code, the property shall be exempt from taxation
 under Section 214 only to the extent provided in subdivision (b) or (c).

(b) (1) If the use of property which has qualified for the welfare exemption under Section 214 involves activities of the organization, some of which produce income that is exempt from income or franchise taxation and some of which produce income that is taxable as unrelated business taxable income, and those activities are attributable to a reasonably ascertainable portion of the entire property, that portion of the property shall be entitled only to a partial exemption from property taxation equal to that proportion of the total value of the portion of the property which the amount of income of the organization that is exempt from income or franchise taxation and that is attributable to that portion bears to the total amount of income of the organization that is attributable to that portion. The remaining proportion of the total value of that
 portion of the property shall be subject to taxation pursuant to this division.

(2) If the use of property which has qualified for the welfare exemption under Section 214 involves activities of the organization, some of which are exempt for property tax purposes and produce no income and some of which produce income that is taxable as unrelated business taxable income, or produce both income that is taxable as unrelated business taxable income and income that is exempt from income or franchise taxation and those activities are attributable to a reasonably ascertainable portion of the entire property, that portion of the property shall be entitled only to a partial exemption equal to that proportion of the total value of the portion of the property which the amount of time actually devoted to those exempt nonincome-producing activities of the organization attributable to that portion bears to the total amount of time actually devoted to all of
 the activities of the organization attributable to that portion. The remaining proportion of the total value of that portion of the property shall be subject to taxation pursuant to this division.

(3) If the activities described in paragraphs (1) and (2) cannot be attributed to a reasonably ascertainable portion of the entire property, the entire property shall be entitled only to a partial exemption. In the case of activities of the organization described in paragraph (1), the partial exemption shall be equal to that proportion of the value of the entire property which the amount of income of the organization that is exempt from income or franchise taxation and that is attributable to the entire property bears to the total amount of income of the organization that is attributable to the entire property. In the case of activities of the organization described in paragraph (2), the partial exemption shall be equal to that proportion of the value
 of the entire property which the amount of time actually devoted to exempt nonincome-producing activities of the organization attributable to the entire property bears to the total amount of time actually devoted to all of the activities of the organization attributable to the entire property. In either case, the remaining proportion of the total value of the entire property shall be subject to taxation pursuant to this division.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), if more than 75 percent of the income of an organization is attributable to property which has qualified for the welfare exemption under Section 214, but is not specifically related to the organization’s use of particular property, the property shall be entitled only to a partial exemption equal to that proportion of the total value of the property which the amount of the income of the organization attributable to activities in this state and exempt from income or franchise taxation
 bears to the amount of total income of the organization that is attributable to activities in this state.

(d) Whenever property is claimed exempt under Section 214 and activities of the organization on the property produce unrelated business taxable income, as defined in Section 512 of the Internal Revenue Code, the organization, as a part of its claim for exemption, shall file with the assessor each of the following: 

(1) The organization’s information and tax returns filed with the Internal Revenue Service for its immediately preceding fiscal year.

(2) Information indicating the amount of time devoted to its income-producing and its nonincome-producing activities and, where applicable, a description of that portion of the property in which those activities are conducted.

(3) A statement listing the specific activities which produce the unrelated business taxable income.

(4) Whenever subdivision (c) is applicable, the amount of income of the organization that is attributable to activities in this state and is exempt from income or franchise taxation and the amount of total income of the organization that is attributable to activities in this state.

(5) Any other information as prescribed by the board.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to enlarge the welfare exemption provided in Section 214.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1606, Sec. 3.   Applicable July 1, 1989, by Sec. 7 of Ch. 1606.)
-------------------------------------------

214.06.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, on or after January 1, 2015, a local government shall not enter into a payment in lieu of taxes (PILOT) agreement with a property owner of a low-income housing project. Any PILOT agreement entered into in violation of this subdivision shall be void and unenforceable.

(b) An inference shall not be drawn from the enactment of this section with regard to whether the law, as it read prior to January 1, 2015, authorized a local government to enter into a PILOT agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 671, Sec. 2.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2015.   See identical section added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 693.)
-------------------------------------------

214.06.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, on or after January 1, 2015, a local government shall not enter into a payment in lieu of taxes (PILOT) agreement with a property owner of a low-income housing project. Any PILOT agreement entered into in violation of this subdivision shall be void and unenforceable.

(b) An inference shall not be drawn from the enactment of this section with regard to whether the law, as it read prior to January 1, 2015, authorized a local government to enter into a PILOT agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 693, Sec. 3.   (SB 1203)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

214.07.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, it shall be conclusively presumed that any payments made under any payment in lieu of taxes (PILOT) agreement entered into before January 1, 2015, comply with the certification requirements of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 214 and were or are used to maintain the affordability of, or reduce rents otherwise necessary for, the units occupied by lower income households.

(b) An inference shall not be drawn from the enactment of this section with regard to whether the law, as it read prior to January 1, 2015, authorized a local government to enter into a PILOT agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 671, Sec. 3.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

214.08.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, both of the following shall apply:

(1) Any outstanding ad valorem tax, interest, or penalty that was levied between January 1, 2012, and January 1, 2015, as a result of a PILOT agreement shall be canceled, and any tax, interest, or penalty, as so levied, that was paid prior to January 1, 2015, shall be refunded.

(2) On or after January 1, 2015, an escape or supplemental assessment shall not be levied on the basis that payments made under a PILOT agreement were, or are being, used in a manner incompatible with the certification requirement contained in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g)
 of Section 214.

(b) An inference shall not be drawn from the enactment of this section with regard to whether the law, as it read prior to January 1, 2015, authorized a local government to enter into a PILOT agreement or impose a PILOT fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 693, Sec. 4.   (SB 1203)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

214.09.

For purposes of Sections 214.06, 214.07, and 214.08, all of the following shall apply:

(a) “Local government” means any city, county, city and county, housing authority, housing successor to a redevelopment agency, or a joint powers agency that has approved land use entitlements or building permits, provided land or financing, or approved the issuance of tax-exempt bonds pursuant to the federal Tax Equity and Fiscal Responsibility Act for the low-income housing project.

(b) “Low-income housing project” means a low-income housing project that is eligible for the exemption provided by subdivision (g) of Section 214.

(c) “Payment in lieu of taxes agreement” means any agreement entered into between a local government and a property owner of a low-income housing project that requires the owner of the low-income housing project to pay the local government a charge to compensate the local government for lost property tax revenues resulting from the low-income housing project receiving an exemption pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 214.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 671, Sec. 4.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

214.1.

As used in Section 214, “property used exclusively for religious, hospital or charitable purposes” shall include facilities in the course of construction on or after the first Monday of March, 1954, together with the land on which the facilities are located as may be required for their convenient use and occupation, to be used exclusively for religious, hospital or charitable purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 950.)
-------------------------------------------

214.2.

(a) As used in Section 214.1, “facilities in the course of construction” shall include the demolition or razing of a building with the intent to replace it with facilities to be used exclusively for religious, hospital, or charitable purposes.

(b) As used in Section 214.1, “facilities in the course of construction” shall include definite onsite physical activity connected with construction or rehabilitation of a new or existing building or improvement, that results in changes
 visible to any person inspecting the site, where the building or improvement is to be used exclusively for religious, hospital, or charitable purposes. Activity as described in the preceding sentence having been commenced and not yet finished, unless abandoned, shall establish that a building or improvement is “under construction” for the purposes of Section 5 of Article XIII of the California Constitution. Construction shall not be considered “abandoned” if delayed due to reasonable causes and circumstances beyond the assessee’s control, that occur notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1180, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

214.3.

In the event that any property described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 214 shall have been used solely for charitable or hospital purposes for a minimum period of 30 years, the “welfare exemption” granted by Section 214 shall extend to such property irrespective of any reversionary provisions in the title of the property respecting liquidation, dissolution or abandonment, if the ownership, operation, use and dedication of the property are otherwise within the purview of Section 214.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 498, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

214.4.

For the purposes of Sections 207 and 214 a school of “less than collegiate grade” is (a) any institution of learning attendance at which exempts a student from attendance at a public full-time elementary or secondary day school under Section 48222 of the Education Code or (b) any institution of learning a majority of whose students are persons that have been excused from attendance at a full-time elementary or secondary day school under Section 48221 or 48226 of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 542, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

214.5.

(a) Property used exclusively for school purposes of less than collegiate grade, or exclusively for purposes of both schools of and less than collegiate grade, and owned and operated by religious, hospital or charitable funds, foundations or corporations, which property and funds, foundations, limited liability companies, or corporations meet all of the requirements of Section 214, shall be deemed to be within the exemption provided for in subdivision (b) of Section 4 and Section 5 of Article XIII of the Constitution of the State of California
 and Section 214. This section shall not be construed to enlarge the college exemption.

(b) The amendments made by the act adding this subdivision shall apply with respect to lien dates occurring on and after January 1, 2005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 354, Sec. 5.   Effective August 30, 2004.   Applicable January 1, 2005, as specified in subd. (b).)
-------------------------------------------

214.6.

(a) (1) Property that is owned by an organization meeting the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 4 of Article XIII of the California Constitution and complying with the requirements of paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 214 and that is leased to an exempt governmental entity for the purpose of conducting an activity that if conducted by the owner
 would qualify the property for an exemption, or leased to a public school, community college, state college, or state university, including the University of California, for educational purposes, shall be deemed to be within the exemption provided for in subdivision (b) of Section 4 of Article XIII of the California Constitution if:

(A) The total income received by the exempt organization in the form of rents, fees, or charges from such lease does not exceed the ordinary and usual expenses in maintaining and operating the leased property; and

(B) With respect to entities that are political subdivisions of the state, the property is located within the boundaries of the exempt governmental entity leasing the same.

(2) To claim the exemption provided by this section for property leased by a qualifying organization to a
 public school, community college, state college, or state university, including the University of California, when both entities use the property in a joint manner, the organization need only attach a copy of the lease agreements with the annual filing of the welfare exemption claim.

(b) To claim the welfare exemption provided by this section for property leased by a church to a public school, community college, state college, or state university, including the University of California, when both entities use the property in a joint manner, and where the church has claimed a religious exemption, the church need only annually file a church lessor’s exemption claim and affirm each of the following:

(1) The total income received by the church in the form of rents, fees, or charges from the lease does not exceed the ordinary and usual expenses in maintaining and operating the leased
 property.

(2) With respect to entities that are political subdivisions of the state, the property is located within the boundaries of the exempt governmental entity leasing the same.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 67, Sec. 5.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

214.7.

In the case of a hospital, neither the use of hospital property nor the receipt of fees or other lawful compensation by a licensed physician for the practice of his profession therein, shall be grounds for denial of the exemption provided by Sections 214 and 254.5. This section does not apply to such portions of a hospital as may be leased or rented to a physician for his office for the general practice of medicine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 532.)
-------------------------------------------

214.8.

(a) Except as provided in Sections 213.7 and 231, and as provided in subdivision (g) of Section 214 with respect to veterans’ organizations, the “welfare exemption” shall not be granted to any organization unless it is qualified as an exempt organization under either Section 23701d of this code or Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. This section shall not be construed to enlarge the “welfare exemption” to apply to organizations qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 but not otherwise qualified for
 the “welfare exemption” under other provisions of this code.

The exemption for veterans’ organizations shall not be granted to any organization unless it is qualified as an exempt organization under either Section 23701f or 23701w of this code or under Section 501(c)(4) or 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code. This section shall not be construed to enlarge the “veterans’ organization exemption” to apply to organizations qualified under Section 501(c)(4) or 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code but not otherwise qualified for the “veterans’ organization exemption” under other provisions of this code.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), an organization shall not be deemed to be qualified as an exempt organization unless the organization files with the assessor a valid organizational clearance certificate issued pursuant to Section 254.6.

(c) (1) For purposes of subdivision (a), a limited liability company wholly owned by one or more qualifying organizations, which may include governmental entities and nonprofit organizations, that are exempt under Section 23701d or under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code shall qualify as an exempt organization.

(2) In the case of a limited liability company that does not have a valid unrevoked letter from the Franchise Tax Board or the Internal Revenue Service, the limited liability company may not be deemed to be qualified as an exempt organization unless each nonprofit tax-exempt member of the limited liability company files with the board a copy of a valid, unrevoked letter or ruling from either the Franchise Tax Board or the Internal Revenue Service that states that the organization qualifies as an exempt organization under the appropriate provisions of the Revenue and Taxation Code or the
 Internal Revenue Code.

(d) The amendments made by the act adding this subdivision shall apply with respect to lien dates occurring on and after January 1, 2005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 224, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

214.9.

For the purposes of Section 214, a “hospital” includes an outpatient clinic, whether or not patients are admitted for overnight stay or longer, where the clinic furnishes or provides psychiatric services for emotionally disturbed children, or where the clinic is a nonprofit multispecialty clinic of the type described in subdivision (l) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, so long as the multispecialty clinic does not reduce the level of charitable or subsidized activities it provides as a proportion of its total activities.

For purposes of this section, a “hospital” does not include those portions
 of an outpatient clinic which may be leased or rented to a physician for an office for the general practice of medicine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1228, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1988, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 1228.)
-------------------------------------------

214.10.

For purposes of Section 214, any nonprofit corporation organized and operated for the advancement of education, improvement of social conditions, and improvement of the job opportunities of low-income, unemployed and underemployed citizens of the communities in which they operate, and otherwise meeting all the requirements of Section 214, shall not be disqualified from receiving the welfare exemption solely because such organization receives all its funds from governmental agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

214.11.

For purposes of Section 214, property owned and operated by a nonprofit organization, otherwise qualifying for exemption under Section 214, shall be deemed to be exclusively used for hospital purposes so long as the property is exclusively used to meet the needs of hospitals which qualify for exemption from property taxation under Section 214 or any other law of the United States or this state. As used in this section, “needs of hospitals” includes any use incidental to, and reasonably necessary for, the functioning of a full hospital operation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 960, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

214.13.

Where property under development pursuant to the Community Redevelopment Law (Pt. 1 (commencing with Sec. 33000), Div. 24, H.&S.C.) is dedicated to religious, charitable, scientific, or hospital purposes in the redevelopment plan and is required by the plan to be conveyed to the state, a county, a city, or a nonprofit entity entitled to a welfare exemption, that property shall be deemed to be within the exemption provided for in Section 5 of Article XIII of the Constitution of the State of California and this section, and shall be exempt from property tax during construction, provided the title to the property is to be conveyed to the state, a county, a
 city, or nonprofit agency within three years of the completion of the construction. If that title is not passed to the state, a county, a city, or nonprofit organization entitled to a welfare exemption within three years of the completion of construction, the owner of the property shall be liable for the taxes that would have been imposed, plus a penalty of 25 percent of the amount due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1261, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

214.14.

(a) Property used exclusively for the charitable purposes of museums and owned and operated by a religious, hospital, scientific, or charitable fund, foundation, limited liability company, or corporation which meets all the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 214 shall be deemed to be within the exemption provided by Sections 4 and 5 of Article XIII of the California Constitution and Section 214.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) Property used exclusively for the charitable purposes of museums shall include property used for activities and facilities related to the primary charitable purposes of museums and reasonably necessary and incidental to those purposes.

(2) Property used exclusively for the charitable purposes of museums shall not be required to be indispensable to the primary charitable purposes of museums.

(3) Property used exclusively for the charitable purposes of museums shall not include property used for activities and facilities not related to the primary charitable purposes of museums and not reasonably necessary or incidental to those purposes.

(4) Property used exclusively for the charitable purposes of museums shall include property owned by a nonprofit
 association or organization performing auxiliary services to any city or county museum in the state and used for the storage of items donated for an annual rummage sale, the proceeds of which, after taking into account the expenses of the nonprofit association or organization, are used to provide support to those museums. For purposes of this subdivision, “storage of items donated for an annual rummage sale” shall not be considered a “fundraising activity,” as that term is used in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 214.

(c) The amendments made by the act adding this subdivision shall apply with respect to lien dates occurring on and after January 1, 2005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 354, Sec. 7.   Effective August 30, 2004.   Applicable January 1, 2005, as specified in subd. (c).)
-------------------------------------------

214.15.

(a) Property is within the exemption provided by Sections 4 and 5 of Article XIII of the California Constitution if that property is owned and operated by a nonprofit corporation, otherwise qualifying for exemption under Section 214, that is organized and operated for the specific and primary purpose of building and rehabilitating single or multifamily residences for sale at cost to low-income families, with financing in the form of a zero interest rate loan and without regard to religion, race, national origin, or the sex of the head of
 household.

(b) (1) In the case of property not previously designated as open space, the exemption specified by subdivision (a) may not be denied to a property on the basis that the property does not currently include a single or multifamily residence as described in that subdivision, or a single or multifamily residence as so described that is in the course of construction.

(2) With regard to paragraph (1), the Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(A) The exempt activities of a nonprofit corporation as described in subdivision (a) qualitatively differ from the exempt activities of other nonprofit entities that provide housing in that the exempt purpose of a nonprofit corporation as described in subdivision (a) is not to own and operate a housing project on an ongoing basis, but
 is instead to make housing, and the land reasonably necessary for the use of that housing, available for prompt sale to low-income residents.

(B) In light of this distinction, the holding of real property by a nonprofit corporation as described in subdivision (a), for the future construction on that property of a single or multifamily residence as described in that same subdivision, is central to that corporation’s exempt purposes and activities.

(C) In light of the factors set forth in subparagraphs (A) and (B), the holding of real property by a nonprofit corporation described in subdivision (a), for the future construction on that property of a single or multifamily residence as described in that same subdivision, constitutes the exclusive use of that property for a charitable purpose within the meaning of subdivision (b) of Section 4 of Article XIII of the California
 Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 927, Sec. 2.   Effective October 10, 1999.   Applicable from January 1, 2000, as prescribed by Sec. 6 of Ch. 927.)
-------------------------------------------

214.15.1.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), property shall be fully exempt from property taxation and is within the exemption provided by Sections 4 and 5 of Article XIII of the California Constitution if that property is owned and operated by a nonprofit corporation, otherwise qualifying for exemption under Section 214, that is organized and operated for the specific and primary purpose of building and rehabilitating single or multifamily residential units, if the property is subject to a 45-year recorded agreement with the appropriate local agency, and if the agreement requires all of the following:

(1) Requires some or all of the property’s units to be owner occupied and sold only to and purchased only by first-time homebuyers that are low-income families.

(2) Requires the initial downpayment on the units described in paragraph (1) to be 5 percent or less of the market value of the unit at the time of purchase.

(3) Requires the units described in paragraph (1) to be made available at an affordable housing cost to buyers.

(b) (1) The property for which the exemption under this section is sought may be related to a larger, mixed-income development project where a portion of the units may be available to persons or families that are not low-income families. However, only the portion of the property proposed to be built or rehabilitated with units that meet the requirements under subdivision (a) shall receive the exemption. Following completion of construction, only the portion of the property with units that meet the requirements under subdivision (a)
 shall receive the exemption.

(2) On each lien date, the assessor shall adjust the exemption allowed under this section by a proration factor that reflects the portion of the property proposed to be built or rehabilitated with units that meet the requirements of subdivision (a) as a percentage of the total development. Following completion of construction, the adjustment shall reflect the portion of the property with units that meet the requirements of subdivision (a) as a percentage of the total development.

(3) The assessor shall assess as escaped property, pursuant to Section 532, any property for which a welfare exemption was granted pursuant to this section if either of the following occurs:

(A) Construction is abandoned.

(B) Upon completion of
 construction, the property does not meet the requirements in subdivision (a). For properties described in this subparagraph, the assessor shall assess as escaped property that portion of the property that was proposed to be, but was not, built or rehabilitated with units that meet the requirements of subdivision (a).

(c) (1) In the case of property not previously designated as open space, the exemption specified by subdivision (a) shall not be denied to a property on the basis that the property does not currently include a single or multifamily residential unit as described in that subdivision, or a single or multifamily residential unit as so described that is in the course of construction.

(2) With regard to paragraph (1), the Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(A) The exempt
 activities of a nonprofit corporation as described in subdivision (a) qualitatively differ from the exempt activities of other nonprofit entities that provide housing in that the exempt purpose of a nonprofit corporation as described in subdivision (a) is not to own and operate a housing project on an ongoing basis, but is instead to make housing, and the land reasonably necessary for the use of that housing, available for prompt sale to low-income residents.

(B) In light of this distinction, the holding of real property by a nonprofit corporation as described in subdivision (a), for the future construction on that property of a single or multifamily residence as described in that same subdivision, is central to that corporation’s exempt purposes and activities.

(C) In light of the factors set forth in subparagraphs (A) and (B), the holding of real property by a nonprofit
 corporation described in subdivision (a), for the future construction on that property of a single or multifamily residence as described in that same subdivision, constitutes the exclusive use of that property for a charitable purpose within the meaning of subdivision (b) of Section 4 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(d) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions apply:

(1) “Abandoned” has the same meaning as that term is used in Section 214.2.

(2) “Affordable housing cost” means a cost, with respect to low-income families, that does not exceed 30 percent of gross income.

(3) “First-time homebuyer” means a person who does not currently have any ownership interest in any principal residence and has not had any ownership
 interest in any principal residence in the three-year period prior to the date that the mortgage is executed for a unit purchased by the person described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of this section. For purposes of this paragraph, “principal residence” means any property used as the person’s principal place of residence.

(4) “Low-income families” means very low income households, as defined in Section 50105, extremely low income households, as defined in Section 50106, lower income households, as defined in Section 50079.5, and persons and families of low income, as defined in Section 50093, and includes persons and families of extremely low income and persons and families of very low income, as those terms are used in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code, as those sections read on January 1, 2022.

(e) The nonprofit corporation that utilizes the exemption in this
 section shall be subject to an annual independent audit to ensure that the buyers of the units meet the requirements of this section. The nonprofit corporation shall make the audit available upon request to the city, county, and county assessor where the unit is located and to the Department of Housing and Community Development in order to continue to qualify for the exemption pursuant to this section.

(f) (1) A nonprofit corporation making a claim for an exemption pursuant to this section shall not be eligible for the exemption under this section unless an officer of the nonprofit corporation signs under penalty of perjury an affidavit affirming to the county assessor that the property owned and operated by the nonprofit corporation is for the future construction of single or multifamily residential units on that property, as required by this section.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, the nonprofit corporation shall be liable for property tax for the years for which the property was exempt from taxation pursuant to this section if the property was not developed or rehabilitated, or if the development or rehabilitation is not in the course of construction, in accordance with subdivision (a) as follows:

(i) In the case of property acquired by the nonprofit corporation before January 1, 2023, by January 1, 2028.

(ii) In the case of property acquired by the nonprofit corporation on and after January 1, 2023, and before January 1, 2028, within five years of the lien date following the acquisition of the property by the nonprofit corporation.

(B) The nonprofit corporation shall notify the assessor of the county in which the
 property is located if property owned by the nonprofit corporation granted an exemption pursuant to this section is not in the course of construction by the dates specified in subparagraph (A).

(g) (1) This section shall be operative for lien dates occurring on or after January 1, 2023, and before January 1, 2028.

(2) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2034, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 203.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

214.16.

(a) Any outstanding tax, interest, or penalty that was levied or imposed upon property that qualifies for an exemption pursuant to Section 214 and satisfies the criteria specified in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 214 between January 1, 2002, and January 1, 2009, shall be canceled, provided that the owner of the property certifies that all of the following conditions were met at the time the tax was levied:

(1) The owner was not organized and did
 not operate for profit.

(2) There was a recorded deed restriction or other legal document that restricted the project’s usage and that provided that the units designated for use by lower income households were continuously available to or occupied by lower income households at rents not exceeding those prescribed by Section 50053 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) The funds that would have been necessary to pay property taxes were used to maintain the affordability of, or reduce rents otherwise necessary for, the units occupied by lower income households.

(b) For purposes of this section, “lower income households” has the same meaning as defined by Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 524, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

214.17.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Total exemption amount limitation” means the exemption amount limitation with respect to a single property or multiple properties that is specified in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 214, as that section read before January 1, 2017.

(2) (A) “Qualified property” means property used exclusively for rental housing and related facilities where 90 percent or more of the occupants of the property are lower income households whose rent does not exceed the rent prescribed by Section 50053 of the Health and Safety Code and
 that qualifies for exemption under Section 214 on the sole basis of this criteria as specified in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 214.

(B) “Qualified property” does not include property owned by a limited partnership in which the managing general partner is an eligible nonprofit organization, as described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 214.

(3) “Qualified taxpayer” means a taxpayer subject to the total exemption amount limitation.

(4) “Qualified claim” means a claim for exemption that was filed for a qualified property with the assessor on and after January 1, 2013, and before January 1, 2017, for which the assessor granted a partial exemption.

(5) “Qualified ad valorem tax in excess of the total exemption amount limitation, and related interest or penalty” means that portion of ad valorem tax levied to a qualified taxpayer on qualified property with respect to a single property or multiple properties that does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of tax, and any interest or penalty imposed with regard to that portion of tax.

(b) (1) Any outstanding qualified ad valorem tax in excess of the total exemption amount limitation, and related interest or penalty, which was levied or imposed on and after January 1, 2013, and before January 1, 2017, with respect to a qualified property for
 which a qualified claim was filed, shall be canceled to the extent that the amount canceled does not result in a total exemption amount in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of tax being allowed to a qualified taxpayer with respect to a single property or multiple properties that are qualified property for any fiscal year.

(2) On or after January 1, 2017, an escape assessment shall not be levied on qualified property if that amount would be subject to cancellation under paragraph (1).
